Maryland, session 2025, HB0210.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
7–106.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “MAIL OR PACKAGE” MEANS AN ITEM DELIVERED OR
LEFT TO BE COLLECTED BY THE U.S. POSTAL SERVICE OR A DELIVERY SERVICE
COMPANY THAT DELIVERS TANGIBLE PERSONAL PROPERTY.
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT KNOWINGLY OR WILLFULLY AND WITHOUT
PERMISSION OF THE INTENDED RECIPIENT OF THE MAIL OR PACKAGE OBTAIN OR
EXERT CONTROL OVER MAIL OR A PACKAGE DELIVERED TO ANOTHER WITH THE
INTENT TO DEPRIVE THE OWNER OF THE MAIL OR PACKAGE.
(C) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY AND
ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 5 YEARS.
(D) FOR A THIRD OR SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION, THE COURT
MAY ORDER THE DEFENDANT TO PARTICIPATE IN A DIVERSION PROGRAM IN LIEU
OF INCARCERATION.
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
4–301.

HOUSE BILL 210 3
(a) Except as provided in §§ 3–803 and 3–8A–03 of this article and 4–302 of this
subtitle, the District Court has exclusive original jurisdiction in a criminal case in which a
person at least 16 years old or a corporation is charged with violation of the vehicle laws,
or the State Boat Act, or regulations adopted pursuant to the vehicle laws or State Boat
Act.
(b) Except as provided in § 4–302 of this subtitle, the District Court also has
exclusive original jurisdiction in a criminal case in which a person at least 18 years old or
a corporation is charged with:
(1) Commission of a common–law or statutory misdemeanor regardless of
the amount of money or value of the property involved;
(2) Violation of § 7–104, § 7–105, § 7–107, or § 7–108 of the Criminal Law
Article, whether a felony or a misdemeanor;
(3) Violation of a county, municipal, or other ordinance, if the violation is
not a felony;
(4) Criminal violation of a State, county, or municipal rule or regulation, if
the violation is not a felony;
(5) Doing or omitting to do any act made punishable by a fine,
imprisonment, or other penalty as provided by the particular law, ordinance, rule, or
regulation defining the violation if the violation is not a felony;
(6) Violation of § 8–103 of the Criminal Law Article, whether a felony or a
misdemeanor;
(7) Violation of § 8–203, § 8–204, § 8–205, § 8–206, § 8–207, § 8–208, or §
8–209 of the Criminal Law Article, whether a felony or misdemeanor;
(8) Forgery or violation of Title 8, Subtitle 6 of the Criminal Law Article,
whether a felony or misdemeanor;
(9) Violation of Title 27, Subtitle 4 of the Insurance Article, whether a
felony or a misdemeanor;
(10) Violation of § 9–1106 of the Labor and Employment Article;
(11) Violation of § 8–301 of the Criminal Law Article, whether a felony or
misdemeanor;
(12) Violation of § 2–209 of the Criminal Law Article;
(13) Violation of Title 2, Subtitle 5 of the Criminal Law Article;

HOUSE BILL 210
(14) Violation of Title 11, Subtitle 5 of the Financial Institutions Article;
(15) Violation of § 10–604, § 10–605, § 10–606, § 10–607, § 10–607.1, or §
10–608 of the Criminal Law Article, whether a felony or misdemeanor;
(16) Violation of Title 7, Subtitle 3, Part III of the Criminal Law Article,
whether a felony or misdemeanor;
(17) Violation of § 20–102 of the Transportation Article, whether a felony or
misdemeanor;
(18) Violation of § 8–801 of the Criminal Law Article;
(19) Violation of § 8–604 of the Criminal Law Article;
(20) Violation of Title 8, Subtitle 2, Part II of the Criminal Law Article;
(21) Violation of § 16–801, § 16–802, § 16–803, or § 16–804 of the Election
Law Article;
(22) Violation of § 3–203(c) of the Criminal Law Article;
(23) Violation of § 11–208 of the Criminal Law Article as a second or
subsequent offense;
(24) Violation of § 11–721 of the Criminal Procedure Article as a second or
subsequent offense; [or]
(25) Violation of § 3–1102(b) or § 3–1103 of the Criminal Law Article; OR
(26) VIOLATION OF § 3–905 OR § 3–905.1 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW
ARTICLE.
4–302.
(a) Except as provided in § 4–301(b)(2), (6), (7), (8), (9), (10), (11), (12), (13), (14),
(15), (16), (17), (18), (19), (20), (21), (22), (23), (24), [and] (25), AND (26) of this subtitle, the
District Court does not have jurisdiction to try a criminal case charging the commission of
a felony.
(b) Except as provided in § 4–303 of this subtitle, the District Court does not have
criminal jurisdiction to try a case in which a juvenile court has exclusive original
jurisdiction.

HOUSE BILL 210 5
(c) The jurisdiction of the District Court is concurrent with that of the juvenile
court in any criminal case arising under the compulsory public school attendance laws of
this State.
(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the jurisdiction
of the District Court is concurrent with that of the circuit court in a criminal case:
(i) In which the penalty may be confinement for 3 years or more or
a fine of $2,500 or more; or
(ii) That is a felony, as provided in § 4–301(b)(2), (6), (7), (8), (9), (10),
(11), (12), (13), (14), (15), (16), (17), (18), (19), (20), (21), (22), (23), (24), [and] (25), AND (26)
of this subtitle.
(2) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, a
circuit court does not have jurisdiction to try a case charging a violation of § 5–601 or §
5–620 of the Criminal Law Article.
(ii) A circuit court does have jurisdiction to try a case charging a
violation of § 5–601 or § 5–620 of the Criminal Law Article if the defendant:
1. Properly demands a jury trial;
2. Appeals as provided by law from a final judgment entered
in the District Court; or
3. Is charged with another offense arising out of the same
circumstances that is within a circuit court’s jurisdiction.
(e) (1) The District Court is deprived of jurisdiction if a defendant is entitled
to and demands a jury trial at any time prior to trial in the District Court.
(2) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, unless
the penalty for the offense with which the defendant is charged permits imprisonment for
a period in excess of 90 days, a defendant is not entitled to a jury trial in a criminal case.
(ii) Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph, the presiding judge of the District Court may deny a defendant a jury trial if:
1. The prosecutor recommends in open court that the judge
not impose a penalty of imprisonment for a period in excess of 90 days, regardless of the
permissible statutory or common law maximum;
2. The judge agrees not to impose a penalty of imprisonment
for a period in excess of 90 days; and

HOUSE BILL 210
3. The judge agrees not to increase the defendant’s bond if an
appeal is noted.
(iii) The State may not demand a jury trial.
(f) (1) Except as provided in Title 4, Subtitle 5 of the Family Law Article, the
District Court does not have jurisdiction of an offense otherwise within the District Court’s
jurisdiction if a person is charged:
(i) With another offense arising out of the same circumstances but
not within the District Court’s jurisdiction; or
(ii) In the circuit court with an offense arising out of the same
circumstances and within the concurrent jurisdictions of the District Court and the circuit
court described under subsection (d) of this section.
(2) In the cases described under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the circuit
court for the county has exclusive original jurisdiction over all the offenses.
Article – Criminal Law
[3–905.
(a) A person may not take and break open a letter that is not addressed to the
person without permission from the person to whom the letter is addressed or the personal
representative of the addressee’s estate.
(b) A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction
is subject to imprisonment for 6 days and a fine of $15.]
3–905.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION, “MAIL” MEANS AN ITEM THAT HAS BEEN OR IS
INTENDED TO BE DELIVERED BY USE OF THE U.S. POSTAL SERVICE OR A COMMON
CARRIER OR DELIVERY SERVICE TO A PERSON WHOSE ADDRESS APPEARS ON THE
ITEM.
(2) “MAIL” INCLUDES AN ADDRESSED LETTER, POSTAL CARD, OR
PACKAGE.
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT KNOWINGLY AND INTENTIONALLY OPEN MAIL
ADDRESSED TO ANOTHER WITHOUT THE PERMISSION OF THE OTHER OR THE
OTHER’S AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OR DESIGNEE.

HOUSE BILL 210 7
(C) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR
AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 1 MONTH OR
A FINE OF $1,000 OR BOTH.
3–905.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ARROW KEY” MEANS A KEY DESIGNED EXCLUSIVELY FOR
ALLOWING AN EMPLOYEE OF THE U.S. POSTAL SERVICE OR A COMMON CARRIER OR
DELIVERY SERVICE TO ACCESS A MAILBOX OR OTHER DEPOSITORY FOR STORING
MAIL.
(3) “MAIL” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3–905 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) A PERSON MAY NOT COMMIT THEFT UNDER § 7–104 OF THIS
ARTICLE INVOLVING ONE OR MORE ITEMS OF MAIL.
(2) A PERSON MAY NOT COMMIT THEFT UNDER § 7–104 OF THIS
ARTICLE INVOLVING ONE OR MORE ITEMS OF MAIL USING AN ARROW KEY.
(C) A PERSON MAY NOT POSSESS AN ARROW KEY WITH THE INTENT TO USE
OR ALLOW THE USE OF THE ARROW KEY IN THE COMMISSION OF A VIOLATION OF
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(D) (1) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION IS
GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT
NOT EXCEEDING 2 YEARS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $1,000 OR BOTH.
(2) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES SUBSECTION (B)(2) OF THIS SECTION IS
GUILTY OF A FELONY AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT
EXCEEDING 5 YEARS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 OR BOTH.
(3) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION IS
GUILTY OF A FELONY AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT
EXCEEDING 3 YEARS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $3,000 OR BOTH.
(E) A SENTENCE IMPOSED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY BE SEPARATE FROM
AND CONSECUTIVE TO OR CONCURRENT WITH A SENTENCE FOR ANY OTHER CRIME
BASED ON THE ACTS ESTABLISHING A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
Article – Criminal Procedure

HOUSE BILL 210
2–503.
(a) (1) A police officer or other employee or agent of a law enforcement agency
may not, in the furtherance of a criminal investigation:
(i) use facial recognition technology to investigate a crime other
than the commission of or the attempt to commit:
1. a crime of violence as defined in § 14–101 of the Criminal
Law Article;
2. a human trafficking offense under Title 3, Subtitle 11 of
the Criminal Law Article;
3. first– or second–degree child abuse under § 3–601 of the
Criminal Law Article;
4. a child pornography offense under § 11–207 of the
Criminal Law Article;
5. a hate crime under § 10–304 of the Criminal Law Article;
6. a weapon crime under § 4–102, § 4–103, § 4–203(a)(1)(iii)
or (iv), § 4–204, or § 4–303(a)(2) of the Criminal Law Article;
7. a weapon crime under § 5–138, § 5–140, § 5–141, §
5–207(c)(16), § 5–406(a)(3), or § 5–703(a) of the Public Safety Article;
8. aggravated cruelty to animals under § 10–606 or § 10–607
of the Criminal Law Article;
9. importation of fentanyl or a fentanyl analogue under §
5–614(a)(1)(xii) of the Criminal Law Article;
10. stalking under § 3–802 of the Criminal Law Article;
11. MAIL THEFT UNDER § 3–905.1 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW
ARTICLE;
[11.] 12. a criminal act involving circumstances presenting a
substantial and ongoing threat to public safety or national security; or
[12.] 13. a crime under the laws of another state
substantially equivalent to a crime listed in items 1 through [10] 11 of this item involving
a fugitive from justice charged with a crime in that state and sought under Title 9 of this
article;

HOUSE BILL 210 9
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.